Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.072

Department of commerce—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not apply within the department of commerce to the director, one confidential secretary, the deputy directors, all assistant directors, the state historic preservation officer, and up to two professional staff members within the emergency management program.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2032; 1995 c 399 s 59; 1986 c 266 s 8.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.